New Jersey, session 221, S2887.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    R.S.34:15-75 is amended to read as follows: 34:15-75.Compensation for injury [and], death, [either] or both, of any individual who is a volunteer [fireman] firefighter, county fire marshal, assistant county fire marshal, volunteer first aid or rescue squad worker, volunteer driver of any municipally-owned or operated ambulance, forest fire warden or forest fire fighter employed by the State of New Jersey, member of a board of education, special reserve or auxiliary [policeman] police officer doing volunteer public police duty under the control or supervision of any commission, council or any other governing body of any municipality, emergency management volunteer doing emergency management service, health care workers, public health workers and support services personnel registered with the Emergency Health Care Provider Registry pursuant to section 6 of P.L.2005, c.222 (C.26:13-6) and doing emergency management service for the State, or any volunteer worker for the Division of Parks and Forestry, the Division of Fish and Wildlife, the New Jersey Natural Lands Trust or the New Jersey Historic Trust, that occurs during the course of performing that individuals duties shall: a.     Be [based upon a weekly salary or compensation conclusively presumed to be received by such person in an amount sufficient to entitle him, or, in the event of his death, his dependents, to receive] equal to the maximum compensation [by this chapter] authorized by this chapter regardless of the individuals outside employment status at the time of the injury or death; and b.    Not be subject to the seven-day waiting period provided in R.S.34:15-14. (cf: P.L.2005, c.222, s.34) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.